Hawaii statutes.
§674-10 Findings and advisory opinion.
(a) The panel shall prepare findings and an advisory opinion concerning the
probable merits of a claim, probable award of compensation, or recommended
corrective action by the State.

(b) The findings and advisory opinion shall be
signed by all members of the panel; provided that any member of the panel may
file a written concurring or dissenting advisory opinion.

(c) The advisory opinion of the panel rendered
on each claim shall be incorporated in the reports required by section 674-14
for submission to the legislature. [L 1991, c 323, pt of §1; am L 1993, c 351,
§7]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next